West Virginia, session 2026, HB4040.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 13B. Non-STATE OWNED Roads Improvement Act. §8-13B-1. Short title. This act may be cited as the "Non-State Owned Roads Improvement Act". §8-13B-2. Definitions. For the purpose of this article"Municipality" means any local government entity, including cities, towns, and counties."Non-state owned roads" means roads that are not owned or maintained by the state or federal government. §8-13B-3. Authority to improve non-state owned roads. Municipalities are hereby granted the authority to undertake improvements on non-state owned roads within their jurisdiction, which includes but is not limited to:(1) Paving and resurfacing;(2) Repairing potholes;(3) Installing signage and traffic signals;(4) Enhancing drainage systems; and(5) Making road safety improvements. §8-13B-4. Legal protection against litigation. (a) No municipality shall be held liable in civil court for damages resulting from improvements made to non-state owned roads: Provided, That:(1) The municipality undertook improvements in good faith;(2) The improvements complied with applicable standards and regulations; and(3) There was no gross negligence or willful misconduct involved in the improvement process. §8-13B-5. Public notification and transparency. (a) Prior to undertaking any improvements, municipalities shall provide public notification of proposed improvements, which may include:(1) Posting a notice at municipal offices;(2) Utilizing local media; or(3) Engaging community meetings.(b) Municipalities shall maintain transparency by publishing project details, timelines, and funding sources on their official websites. §8-13B-6. Funding. Municipalities are authorized to make improvements on non-state owned roads and may do so using:(1) Existing municipal funds authorized for infrastructure development; (2) State and federal grants dedicated to infrastructure development; and(3) Partnerships with private entities. §8-13B-7. Effective date. This act shall take effect immediately upon its passage and approval.